Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.279

Sexual assault—Statewide resource prosecutor grant program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall administer a grant program for establishing a statewide resource prosecutor for sexual assault cases.

(2) The grant recipient must be a statewide organization or association representing prosecuting attorneys. The grant recipient shall hire a resource prosecutor for the following purposes:

(a) To provide technical assistance and research to prosecutors for prosecuting sexual assault cases;

(b) To provide additional training and resources to prosecutors to support a trauma-informed, victim-centered approach to prosecuting sexual assault cases;

(c) To meet regularly with law enforcement agencies and prosecutors to explain legal issues and prosecutorial approaches to sexual assault cases and provide and receive feedback to improve case outcomes;

(d) To consult with the commission, the office of the attorney general, and the sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group under RCW 43.10.801 with respect to developing and implementing best practices for prosecuting sexual assault cases across the state; and

(e) To comply with other requirements established by the commission under this section.

(3) The commission may, in consultation with the sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group under RCW 43.10.801, establish additional appropriate conditions for any grant awarded under this section. The commission may adopt necessary policies and procedures to implement and administer the grant program, including monitoring the use of grant funds and compliance with the grant requirements.

[ 2023 c 197 s 2.]